Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1330
Unallocated contributions forfeited; use.

All unallocated contributions forfeited pursuant to section 35-1314 shall be used by the city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district to finance the cost of conducting the service award benefit program or, at the discretion of the city, village, or rural or suburban fire protection district, to reduce the current or future deposits to the service award benefit program.

Laws 1999, LB 849, § 30;

Laws 2001, LB 808, § 20;

Laws 2005, LB 268, § 5.